District of Columbia statutes.
47-1809.01

Tax on estates and trusts — Residency definitions.

For the purposes of this subchapter, estates and trusts are: (1) Resident estates or trusts, or (2) nonresident estates or trusts. If the decedent was at the time of his death domiciled within the District, his estate is a resident estate, and any trust created by his will is a resident trust. If the decedent was not at the time of his death domiciled within the District, his estate is a nonresident estate, and any trust created by his will is a nonresident trust. If the creator of a trust was at the time the trust was created domiciled within the District, or if the trust consists of property of a person domiciled within the District, the trust is a resident trust. If the creator of the trust was not at the time the trust was created domiciled within the District, the trust is a nonresident trust. If the trust resulted from the dissolution of a corporation organized under the laws of the District of Columbia the trust is a resident trust. If the trust resulted from the dissolution of a foreign corporation, the trust is a nonresident trust.

July 16, 1947, 61 Stat. 346, ch. 258, art. I, title IX, § 1
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
This section is referenced in § 47-1809.02.
1981 Ed., § 47-1809.1.
1973 Ed., § 47-1577.